Idaho, session 2025, H0295.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 12, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1204A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1204A. ADMINISTRATOR LEADERSHIP APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM. (1) An
individual who does not otherwise hold an administrator certificate re-
quired to be a school principal or superintendent may meet the standards of
employment for such positions or similar positions by participating in and
successfully completing the administrator leadership apprenticeship pro-
gram as an apprentice in such positions.
(2) To qualify for the administrator leadership apprenticeship program
in a school principal role, an individual shall:
(a) Pass a criminal history check provided for in section 33-130, Idaho
Code;
(b) Hold, at a minimum, a bachelor's degree from a regionally or nation-
ally accredited college or university;
(c) Possess a professional background that demonstrates competency in
at least one (1) of the following disciplines:
(i) Higher education;
(ii) Governmental service in a management or leadership role;
(iii) Nonprofit organization service in a management or leader-
ship role;
(iv) Private sector service in a management or leadership role;
(v) Military service at the officer level; or
(vi) Some other education-related experience;
(d) Be sponsored by a public school district or local education agency;
and
(e) Be enrolled in or have previously successfully completed an ad-
ministrator leadership program at a regionally accredited university
domiciled in Idaho.
(3) To qualify for the administrator leadership apprenticeship program
in a school district superintendent role, deputy superintendent role, or
other similar role, an individual shall:
(a) Pass a criminal history check provided for in section 33-130, Idaho
Code;
(b) Hold, at a minimum, a master's degree from a regionally or nation-
ally accredited college or university;


(c) Possess a professional background that demonstrates competency in
at least one (1) of the following disciplines:
(i) Higher education;
(ii) Governmental service in a management or leadership role;
(iii) Nonprofit organization service in a management or leader-
ship role;
(iv) Private sector service in a management or leadership role;
(v) Military service at the officer level; or
(vi) Some other education-related experience;
(d) Be sponsored by a public school district or local education agency;
and
(e) Be enrolled in or have previously successfully completed a superin-
tendent leadership program at a regionally accredited university domi-
ciled in Idaho.
(4) An individual who is offered employment in a position by a school
district in a school principal role, school district superintendent role,
or other similar role as an apprentice for three (3) consecutive years shall
be eligible to receive the same certificate as the certificate of others who
are employed in the same role as long as such individual continues to comply
with the applicable requirements set forth in this section and with all other
applicable laws.
(5) An individual who successfully completes the administrator leader-
ship apprenticeship program and earns an administrator certificate shall be
subject to ongoing review.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.